src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON	_N4621

 ! non possessive forms

+N+Sg+Nom:ыр K ;
+N+Sg+Loc:ырт K ;
+N+Sg+Lat:рын K ;
+N+Sg+Abl:ырныл K ;
+N+Sg+Instr:рыл K ;
+N+Sg+Trans:риг K ;

+N+Du+Nom:рыг K ;
+N+Du+Loc:рыгт K ;
+N+Du+Lat:рыгн K ;
+N+Du+Abl:рыгныл K ;
+N+Du+Instr:рыгтыл K ;

+N+Pl+Nom:рыт K ;
+N+Pl+Loc:рытт K ;
+N+Pl+Lat:рытн K ;

+N+Pl+Lat:рытын K ;
+N+Pl+Abl:рытныл K ;
+N+Pl+Instr:рытыл K ;

 ! possessive forms

+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom:рум K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg1+Loc:румт K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg1+Lat:румн K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg1+Abl:румныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg1+Instr:румтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxSg1+Nom:рагум K ;
+N+Du+PxSg1+Loc:рагумт K ;
+N+Du+PxSg1+Lat:рагумн K ;
+N+Du+PxSg1+Abl:рагумныл K ;
+N+Du+PxSg1+Instr:рагумтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxSg1+Nom:ранум K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg1+Loc:ранумт K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg1+Lat:ранумн K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg1+Abl:ранумныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg1+Instr:ранумтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom:рын K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg2+Loc:рынт K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg2+Lat:рынн K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg2+Abl:рынныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg2+Instr:рынтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxSg2+Nom:рагын K ;
+N+Du+PxSg2+Loc:рагынт K ;
+N+Du+PxSg2+Lat:рагынн K ;
+N+Du+PxSg2+Abl:рагынныл K ;
+N+Du+PxSg2+Instr:рагынтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom:ран K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Loc:рант K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Lat:ранн K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Abl:ранныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Instr:рантыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom:ранын K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Loc:ранынт K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Lat:ранынн K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Abl:ранынныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Instr:ранынтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom:ре K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg3+Loc:рет K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg3+Lat:рен K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg3+Abl:реныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg3+Instr:ретыл K ;

+N+Du+PxSg3+Nom:раге K ;
+N+Du+PxSg3+Loc:рагет K ;
+N+Du+PxSg3+Lat:раген K ;
+N+Du+PxSg3+Abl:рагеныл K ;
+N+Du+PxSg3+Instr:рагетыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxSg3+Nom:ранэ K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg3+Loc:ранэт K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg3+Lat:ранэн K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg3+Abl:ранэныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg3+Instr:ранэтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxDu1+Nom:ырме̄н K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu1+Loc:ырме̄нт K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu1+Lat:ырме̄нн K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu1+Abl:ырме̄нныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu1+Instr:ырме̄нтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxDu1+Nom:рагме̄н K ;
+N+Du+PxDu1+Loc:рагме̄нт K ;
+N+Du+PxDu1+Lat:рагме̄нн K ;
+N+Du+PxDu1+Abl:рагме̄нныл K ;
+N+Du+PxDu1+Instr:рагме̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxDu1+Nom:ранме̄н K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu1+Loc:ранме̄нт K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu1+Lat:ранме̄нн K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu1+Abl:ранме̄нныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu1+Instr:ранме̄нтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxDu2+Nom:рын K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu2+Loc:рынт K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu2+Lat:рынн K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu2+Abl:рынныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu2+Instr:рынтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxDu2+Nom:рагы̄н K ;
+N+Du+PxDu2+Loc:рагы̄нт K ;
+N+Du+PxDu2+Lat:рагы̄нн K ;
+N+Du+PxDu2+Abl:рагы̄нныл K ;
+N+Du+PxDu2+Instr:рагы̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxDu2+Nom:раны̄н K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Loc:раны̄нт K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Lat:раны̄нн K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Abl:раны̄нныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Instr:раны̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxDu2+Nom:ран K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Loc:рант K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Lat:ранн K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Abl:ранныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Instr:рантыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxDu3+Nom:ре̄н K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu3+Loc:ре̄нт K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu3+Lat:ре̄нн K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu3+Abl:ре̄нныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu3+Instr:ре̄нтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxDu3+Nom:раге̄н K ;
+N+Du+PxDu3+Loc:раге̄нт K ;
+N+Du+PxDu3+Lat:раге̄нн K ;
+N+Du+PxDu3+Abl:раге̄нныл K ;
+N+Du+PxDu3+Instr:раге̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxDu3+Nom:ранэн K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu3+Loc:ранэнт K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu3+Lat:ранэнн K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu3+Abl:ранэнныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu3+Instr:ранэнтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxPl1+Nom:рув K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl1+Loc:рувт K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl1+Lat:рувн K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl1+Abl:рувныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl1+Instr:рувтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxPl1+Nom:рагув K ;
+N+Du+PxPl1+Loc:рагувт K ;
+N+Du+PxPl1+Lat:рагувн K ;
+N+Du+PxPl1+Abl:рагувныл K ;
+N+Du+PxPl1+Instr:рагувтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl1+Nom:ранув K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl1+Loc:ранувт K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl1+Lat:ранувн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl1+Abl:ранувныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl1+Instr:ранувтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxPl2+Nom:ры̄н K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl2+Loc:ры̄нт K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl2+Lat:ры̄нн K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl2+Abl:ры̄нныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl2+Instr:ры̄нтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxPl2+Nom:рагы̄н K ;
+N+Du+PxPl2+Loc:рагы̄нт K ;
+N+Du+PxPl2+Lat:рагы̄нн K ;
+N+Du+PxPl2+Abl:рагы̄нныл K ;
+N+Du+PxPl2+Instr:рагы̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl2+Nom:раны̄н K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Loc:раны̄нт K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Lat:раны̄нн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Abl:раны̄нныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Instr:раны̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl2+Nom:ран K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Loc:рант K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Lat:ранн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Abl:ранныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Instr:рантыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxPl3+Nom:раныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl3+Loc:ранылт K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl3+Lat:ранылн K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl3+Abl:ранылныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl3+Instr:ранылтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxPl3+Nom:рага̄ныл K ;
+N+Du+PxPl3+Loc:рага̄нылт K ;
+N+Du+PxPl3+Lat:рага̄нылн K ;
+N+Du+PxPl3+Abl:рага̄нылныл K ;
+N+Du+PxPl3+Instr:рага̄нылтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom:рананыл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Loc:рананылт K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Lat:рананылн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Abl:рананылныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Instr:рананылтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom:ра̄ныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Loc:ра̄нылт K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Lat:ра̄нылн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Abl:ра̄нылныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Instr:ра̄нылтыл K ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
